West Virginia, session 2025, SB254.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 8c. Filming of sexually explicit conduct of minors. §61-8C-2a Prohibited digital manipulation of media. Any person who modifies or otherwise changes a photograph, image, video clip, movie, or recording containing sexually explicit conduct by the insertion therein of a visual image of an actual minor so as to create the appearance that it is a minor engaged in the sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction shall be fined not more than $10,000 or confined in a state correctional facility for not less than one nor more than five years or both fined and confined.As used in this section "actual minor" means a living or once living person the image of whom was taken or captured when he or she was under the age of 18 and later inserted into a photograph, image, video clip, movie or recording containing sexually explicit conduct.The provisions of this section constitute a separate and distinct offense from any other                set forth in this code.